Hawaii statutes.
§386-209 Monetary penalties. After
notice and opportunity for a hearing, the insurance commissioner may impose a
monetary penalty on any person or group found to be in violation of any
provision of this chapter or any rule adopted thereunder. The monetary penalty
shall not exceed $1,000 for each act or violation and shall not exceed $10,000
in the aggregate. The amount of any monetary penalty shall be paid to the
insurance commissioner and transmitted to the director of finance for deposit
into the general fund. [L 1986, c 304, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next